Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-3202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of Chapter 2, article 32, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Commission means the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission;

(2) Natural resources district or district means a natural resources district operating pursuant to Chapter 2, article 32;

(3) Board means the board of directors of a district;

(4) Director means a member of the board;

(5) Other special-purpose districts means rural water districts, drainage districts, reclamation districts, and irrigation districts;

(6) Manager means the chief executive hired by a majority vote of the board to be the supervising officer of the district; and

(7) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 2, p. 101;

Laws 1972, LB 543, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 335, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1045, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 896, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 51;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB701, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 25.

Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, see section 81-1571.

Nebraska Natural Resources Commission, see section 2-1504.